Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1847
Act, how construed.

The Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 47.